Utah statutes.
34A-7-101.   Scope of chapter -- Exemptions.

(1)  Except as provided in Subsection (2), this part applies to any boiler or pressure vessel used in:

(a)  industrial or manufacturing establishments;

(b)  business establishments;

(c)  sawmills;

(d)  construction jobs; and

(e)  any place where workers or the public may be exposed to risks from the operation of boilers or pressure vessels.

(2)  This part does not apply to:

(a)  a boiler or pressure vessel subject to inspection, control, or regulation under the terms of any law or regulation of the federal government or any of its agencies;

(b)  an air tank located on a vehicle used for transporting passengers or freight; or

(c) a boiler or pressure vessel that is excluded from the Boiler and Pressure Vessel Code published by the American Society of Mechanical Engineers.

